Vermont, session 2025-2026, H298.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. INTENT
(a) It is the intent of the General Assembly to ensure equality under the law
for all residents of Vermont by restricting assistance to federal immigration
authorities as such assistance can undermine the public trust and
disproportionately impact Vermont’s immigrant communities.
(b) It is the further intent of the General Assembly to divest from assisting
federal immigration authorities to the greatest extent possible under the law,
including the examination and possible termination of federal contracts with
the Department of Corrections that do not align with Vermont’s values and
policies.
Sec. 2. 28 V.S.A. § 101 is amended to read:
§ 101. POWERS OF THE DEPARTMENT
The Department is charged with the following powers:
(1) to establish, maintain, and administer such State correctional
facilities and programs as may be required for the custody, control,
correctional treatment, and rehabilitation of committed persons, and for the
safekeeping of such other persons as may be committed to the Department in
accordance with law;
VT LEG #380939 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.298
2025 Page 3 of 7
(2) to operate diagnostic and treatment programs and such other
programs deemed desirable to treat persons committed to the Department and
to further other purposes and objectives of this title;
(3) to administer the supervision of persons placed on probation and
released on parole and to administer probation and parole services;
(4) to employ such officers, employees and agents as deemed necessary
to discharge the functions of the Department;
(5) to establish standards for the management, operation, personnel, and
program of all correctional facilities in the State;
(6) to act in an advisory capacity in assisting law enforcement agencies,
except federal immigration authorities, and communities in the prevention of
crime and delinquency;
(7) to enforce and administer such other laws as may be vested in the
Department;
(8) to enter into agreements for assistance in support of the operation of
jails or lockups in accordance with criteria established by the Department, and
to use the jails or lockups as provided in this title, except agreements or
cooperative arrangements to assist federal immigration authorities;
(9) notwithstanding any other provision of law, the State and the
Department shall not be responsible for the expense of detaining a person in
custody except as provided in this title;
VT LEG #380939 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.298
2025 Page 4 of 7
(10) to charter, establish, and fund through grants such municipal
entities or nonprofit organizations as may be required for providing crime
prevention and restorative justice programs for offenders, victims of crime, and
the public.
Sec. 3. 28 V.S.A. § 102(b) is amended to read:
(b) The Commissioner is charged with the following powers:
* * *
(8) To cooperate with and accept funds from the federal government or
any agency thereof, except any federal immigration authority, for the purpose
of exercising the powers and responsibilities stated in this section.
* * *
Sec. 4. 28 V.S.A. § 108 is added to read:
§ 108. DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS; FEDERAL IMMIGRATION
AUTHORITIES; RESTRICTIONS ON ASSISTANCE
(a) Restrictions.
(1) The Department of Corrections shall not contact any federal
immigration authorities for assistance on the basis of an inmate’s or offender’s
race, ethnicity, national original, or actual or suspected immigration status.
(2) The Department of Corrections shall not prolong the detention of
any person to investigate immigration status or permit federal immigration
VT LEG #380939 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.298
2025 Page 5 of 7
authorities to investigate the immigration status of any person in the custody of
the Department unless required by federal law.
(3) The Department of Corrections shall not accept requests by federal
immigration authorities to support or assist in operations that primarily concern
immigration enforcement.
(4) The Department of Corrections shall not detain or transfer persons in
its custody to federal immigration authorities unless a judicial warrant for
arrest is provided. An immigration detainer shall not be considered a judicial
warrant or a lawful basis to continue the detention of a person in the custody of
the Department. This subsection shall not be construed to affect the detention
associated with criminal arrest warrants.
(b) Reporting.
(1) Annually, on or before December 1, the Department of Corrections
shall submit a written report to the House Committees on Corrections and
Institutions and on Government Operations and Military Affairs and the Senate
Committees on Institutions and on Government Operations detailing any
requests for assistance from federal immigration authorities and the
Department’s response to any requests, in addition to any legal challenges or
federal mandates concerning assistance or collaboration with federal
immigration authorities.
VT LEG #380939 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.298
2025 Page 6 of 7
(2) The Department of Corrections shall report any noncompliance with
the provisions of this section or rules adopted pursuant to this section to the
Office of the Vermont State Auditor.
(c) Rulemaking. The Department of Corrections shall adopt rules pursuant
to 3 V.S.A. chapter 25 creating:
(1) training and education for Department personnel to comply with this
section and any relevant federal laws;
(2) protocols for the intake and responses to any federal immigration
authority inquiries relevant to the provisions of this section; and
(3) penalties for Department personnel who do not comply with the
provisions of this section, including discipline, termination, and monetary
fines.
Sec. 5. DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS; FEDERAL IMMIGRATION
AUTHORITIES; CURRENT COOPERATION; TERMINATION
(a)(1) The Department of Corrections shall provide a written report
detailing the existence and scope of the agreements, cooperation, or assistance
provided to federal immigration authorities, including any financial and
resource implications.
(2) The report identified in subdivision (1) of this subsection shall be
submitted to the House Committees on Corrections and Institutions and on
Government Operations and Military Affairs and the Senate Committees on
VT LEG #380939 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.298
2025 Page 7 of 7
Institutions and on Government Operations within 30 days after passage of this
act.
(b) The Department of Corrections shall terminate any existing contracts or
agreements with federal immigration authorities within 30 days after passage
of this act except as required by federal law.
Sec. 6. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on passage.
VT LEG #380939 v.1